Massachusetts, session 194th, H1510.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 186 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 31 the following section:-
Section 32. An entity taking a credit under section 6I of chapter 62, section 31H of
chapter 63, section 6(q) of chapter 62 or section 38BB of chapter 63 shall establish diversity
goals for its ownership to reflect the demographic population of the properties it owns.
The department of housing and community development shall promulgate regulations for
implementation and enforcement of this section.
of 1